New York, session 2025-2026, S2493.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 75-0115 of the environmental conservation law is 2 amended by adding two new subdivisions 5 and 6 to read as follows: 3 5. Within one year of the effective date of this subdivision, the 4 department shall prepare an addendum to the report on strategies to 5 reduce emissions of toxic air contaminants and criteria air pollutants 6 in disadvantaged communities, as described in subdivision three of this 7 section, which shall include the following: 8 a. an assessment of the role that the department's approval or disap- 9 proval for permits and certificates for air contamination sources, as 10 authorized in paragraph j of subdivision two of section 19-0305 of this 11 chapter, plays in contributing to such stationary and mobile sources of 12 pollution and their relative contribution to elevated exposure to air 13 pollution in impacted communities; and 14 b. a detailed description of the role that the department's operating 15 permit program for sources subject to Title V of the federal Clean Air 16 Act, as described in section 19-0311 of this chapter, in particular 17 plays in contributing to such stationary and mobile sources of 18 pollution. 19 6. a. The department shall release, in conjunction with the addendum 20 report described in subdivision five of this section, a listing of all 21 last mile warehouses receiving permits and certificates for air contam- 22 ination sources as authorized in paragraph j of subdivision two of 23 section 19-0305 of this chapter. As used in this subdivision "last mile 24 warehouse" shall refer to a facility that: (i) contains at least fifty EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02552-01-5 S. 2493 2 1 thousand square feet of total floor space that is used for warehouse 2 activities; and (ii) has as its primary purpose the temporary storage, 3 sorting, and redistribution of goods to fulfill e-commerce orders by 4 receiving shipments of goods from one mode of transport and redistribut- 5 ing those goods via a delivery vehicle. A "last mile warehouse" shall 6 not include any facility where goods are manufactured or assembled on 7 site and temporarily stored prior to distribution, or any facility that 8 has as its primary purpose the temporary storage of food products for 9 wholesale distribution. 10 b. The department shall represent the last mile warehouses receiving 11 permits and certificates for air contamination sources described in 12 paragraph a of this subdivision on a statewide map to be maintained on a 13 publicly accessible website. In designing and maintaining such map, the 14 department shall allow a user of such website to view the distribution 15 of such warehouses across the state separately from and in conjunction 16 with any other category of facility, site, parcel, area, trail, or other 17 category of information on such map. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately.